Colorado, session 2026A, SB022.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds that:
(a) Colorado energy prices are rising at an untenable pace for the
state's most vulnerable populations, disproportionately impacting
income-qualified residents and creating an energy affordability crisis that
forces struggling families and small businesses to make difficult decisions
regarding trade-offs for necessary expenses;
(b) As a result, utility payment delinquencies are at an all-time
high and utility bill payment assistance programs are struggling to support
the expanding needs of community members;
-2- SB26-022

(c) Energy Outreach Colorado's 2024 annual report shows that
nearly one in 5 Colorado families spend 7% or more of their income on
energy bills, with 10.1% of families facing a severe energy burden of
spending over 10% of their income on energy bills;
(d) Further, utility data reported to the U.S. energy information
administration shows a 22% increase in the cost of residential electricity
in Colorado over the last 6 years, worsened by double-digit rate increases
forecasted in upcoming years;
(e) The Colorado department of human services, referred to in this
section as "DHS", received over 136,000 applications for low-income
home energy assistance in state fiscal year 2024-25;
(f) DHS approved over 60% of these applications and provided
over $49,800,000 at an average benefit of over $565 per applicant. The
total number of applications with DHS for low-income home energy
assistance has increased 44% since 2019 and total payouts have increased
over 58%, demonstrating the severity of the affordability crisis.
(g) In state fiscal year 2024-25, DHS received the greatest number
of applications for assistance from El Paso county residents, with over
18,000 applications. DHS approved over 11,000 of these applications and
provided more than $5.69 million in assistance to El Paso county
residents.
(h) Requests with DHS for low-income energy assistance from El
Paso county have increased 48% since 2019, and El Paso county has led
the state each year in the total number of applications since 2019;
(i) Because of the cost pressure already faced by many
income-qualified Coloradans, certain safeguards must exist to protect
already struggling ratepayers as Colorado undergoes a monumental clean
-3- SB26-022

energy transition to achieve a carbon-free state economy;
(j) Electricity must be made available on demand to maintain the
reliability of the grid, and electric utilities must maintain a certain level
of firm electric generation resources that can be controlled or dispatched
when needed;
(k) The early retirement of these firm dispatchable electric
generation resources before sufficient replacement generating capacity is
made available causes resource adequacy challenges and significantly
increases uncertainty as to when and how much energy is needed and
available;
(l) Insufficient electric resource adequacy can lead to power
disruptions that directly impact the health and safety of Coloradans and
the vital services offered by hospitals, schools, and first responders;
(m) Because of the implications to national security, federal law
requires that military installations have electric power available at least
99.9% of the time;
(n) Colorado is home to 6 major military installations that are
critical components of our national defense infrastructure, with 5 of the
installations in El Paso county and one installation in Aurora;
(o) Ensuring continued reliable and affordable electric service to
the military is crucial to ensuring installations in Colorado can achieve
their critical missions and lessen the pressure to relocate these facilities
to other parts of the country;
(p) Electric utilities throughout Colorado vastly differ from one
another based on the communities they serve, their business model, the
size of their service territories, the technical capabilities of their systems,
and many other factors; however, the state's clean energy planning
-4- SB26-022

framework requires all electric utilities to achieve the exact same
greenhouse gas emission reductions by the exact same dates;
(q) Access to electric transmission and interconnection facilities
is the key factor in determining a utility's ability to access new renewable
energy resources and quickly retire and replace its generation fleet in a
reliable and affordable fashion;
(r) However, not all utilities have the same access to the same
transmission and interconnection assets, and more transmission must be
built to give Colorado utilities a more equal footing in their ability to
access a broader array of resources;
(s) Several of Colorado's not-for-profit electric utilities are
expected to join the Southwest Power Pool regional transmission
organization in 2026, which will afford these utilities with new pathways
to access the resources necessary to achieve their clean energy targets,
especially the identification, funding, and construction of new
transmission projects;
(t) However, the process to identify new transmission projects in
the regional transmission organization will not begin until 2027, and the
construction of such projects will take several years to permit and
construct;
(u) In addition to barriers to transmission access, Colorado
utilities have been challenged by market conditions that were
unanticipated when the clean energy planning framework was established
in 2019 and amended in 2023, including an ever-changing federal policy
environment, unpredictable tariffs, supply chain disruptions, and the
repeal of clean energy subsidies for electricity investment and production
tax credits for wind and solar projects;
-5- SB26-022

(v) These federal changes have increased the cost, time, and
regulatory risk and ratepayer burden of advancing clean energy goals;
(w) The inflexibility in Colorado's clean energy planning
framework does not recognize the material challenges utilities are facing
and offers no relief for utilities that are willing but unable to meet the
state's emission reduction targets within the next 4 years without
significant cost increases and threats to reliability; and
(x) Environmental sustainability remains a priority of the general
assembly. However, state policy must not impose an undue financial
burden on ratepayers, with particular attention to income-qualified
households and the protection of community members and critical
services requiring uninterrupted power.
(2) Therefore, the general assembly determines and declares that
Colorado's clean energy planning framework should include flexibility for
utilities that are unable to achieve their clean energy targets and consider
retail rate impacts and reliability standards to protect consumers and
prevent statewide resource adequacy constraints.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-7-105, amend (1)
introductory portion and (1)(e)(VIII.5)(H); and add (1)(e)(VIII.5)(I) as
follows:
25-7-105. Duties of commission - technical secretary - rules -
report - legislative declaration - definitions - repeal.
(1) Except as provided in sections 25-7-130 and 25-7-131, the
commission shall promulgate ADOPT rules that are consistent with the
legislative declaration set forth in section 25-7-102 and necessary for the
proper implementation and administration of this article 7, including:
(e) (VIII.5) (H) No later than March 31, 2026, any MAY 31, 2026,
-6- SB26-022

AN entity required to submit THAT SUBMITS a clean energy plan or a plan
pursuant to subsection (1)(e)(VIII)(I) SUBSECTION (1)(e)(VIII) of this
section to the division may inform the division in writing of any
challenges the entity is encountering or expects to encounter in achieving
at least an eighty percent reduction of greenhouse gas emissions caused
by the entity's Colorado electricity sales by 2030 relative to 2005 levels.
If an entity informs the division of any challenges in achieving the
greenhouse gas emissions reduction percentage, the division, in
coordination with the Colorado energy office created in section
24-38.5-101 (1), shall hold at least one public stakeholder meeting in
2026 to discuss the challenges raised by the entity and strategies for the
entity to achieve the greenhouse gas emissions reduction percentage. If,
after the public stakeholder meeting, an THE entity informs the division
in writing that the entity is still encountering or expects to encounter
challenges in achieving the greenhouse gas emissions reduction
percentage, no later than December 31, 2026, the division shall submit a
concise report to the general assembly summarizing the challenges the
entity is encountering or expects to encounter and describing any potential
solutions to the challenges. This subsection (1)(e)(VIII.5)(H) is repealed,
effective July 1, 2027.
(I) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER REQUIREMENT OF THIS
SUBSECTION (1)(e), AN ENTITY DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1)(e)(VIII)(F)
OF THIS SECTION THAT, ON OR BEFORE MAY 31, 2026, INFORMS THE
DIVISION OF CHALLENGES IN ACHIEVING THE GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS
REDUCTION PERCENTAGE MAY SUBMIT AN UPDATED CLEAN ENERGY PLAN
TO THE DIVISION, NO LATER THAN DECEMBER 31, 2026, WITH THE
EARLIEST YEAR, NOT LATER THAN 2040, THAT THE ENTITY EXPECTS TO BE
-7- SB26-022

ABLE TO ACHIEVE AT LEAST AN EIGHTY PERCENT REDUCTION OF
GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS CAUSED BY THE ENTITY'S COLORADO
ELECTRICITY SALES RELATIVE TO 2005 LEVELS WITHOUT IMPAIRING THE
ENTITY'S ABILITY TO MAINTAIN THE ELECTRIC RELIABILITY STANDARDS
ADOPTED BY THE NORTH AMERICAN ELECTRIC RELIABILITY
CORPORATION OR A REGIONAL TRANSMISSION ORGANIZATION OF WHICH
THE ENTITY IS A MEMBER AND WITHOUT RESULTING IN AN INCREASE IN THE
ENTITY'S AVERAGE ANNUAL ELECTRICITY RATES GREATER THAN ONE AND
ONE-HALF PERCENT. NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS
SECTION, NEITHER THE COMMISSION NOR THE DIVISION SHALL UNDERTAKE
ANY ACTION THAT IMPAIRS THE ENTITY'S ABILITY TO MAINTAIN THE
ELECTRIC RELIABILITY STANDARDS ADOPTED BY THE NORTH AMERICAN
ELECTRIC RELIABILITY CORPORATION OR A REGIONAL TRANSMISSION
ORGANIZATION OF WHICH THE ENTITY IS A MEMBER OR THAT RESULTS IN
AN INCREASE IN THE ENTITY'S AVERAGE ANNUAL ELECTRICITY RATES
GREATER THAN ONE AND ONE-HALF PERCENT.
SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-8- SB26-022